Montana, session 2025, HB130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 76-13-115, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-13-115. State fire policy. The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) the safety of the public and of firefighters is paramount in all wildfire suppression activities;
(2) it is a priority to minimize property and resource loss resulting from wildfire and to minimize
expense to Montana taxpayers, which is generally accomplished through an aggressive and rapid initial attack
effort;
(3) interagency cooperation and coordination among local, state, and federal agencies are
intended and encouraged, including cooperation when restricting activity or closing areas to access becomes
necessary;
(4) fire prevention, hazard reduction, and loss mitigation are fundamental components of this
policy;
(5) all property in Montana has wildfire protection from a recognized fire protection entity;
(6) the department has a duty to engage in wildfire suppression activities in the state regardless of
land ownership if the department determines that the federal wildfire suppression activities within 5 miles of
department or county wildland fire protection are not consistent with 76-13-104. The department may, at its sole
discretion, bill the responsible recognized federal protection agency for costs incurred in suppression when
appropriate.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 130
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 130
(6)(7) all private property owners and federal and state public land management agencies have a
responsibility to manage resources, mitigate fire hazards, and otherwise prevent fires on their property;
(7)(8) sound forest management activities to reduce fire risk, such as thinning, prescribed burning,
and insect and disease treatments, improve the overall diversity and vigor of forested landscapes and improve
the condition of related water, wildlife, recreation, and aesthetic resources;
(8)(9) development of fire protection guidelines for the wildland-urban interface is critical to improving
public safety and for reducing risk and loss; and
(9)(10) catastrophic wildland fire in wildland-urban interface areas resulting from inadequate federal
land management activities to reduce fire risk has the potential to jeopardize Montanans' inalienable right to a
clean and healthful environment guaranteed in Article II, section 3, of the Montana constitution."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 130
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 130, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 130
INTRODUCED BY L. JONES, W. GALT, J. SECKINGER, S. ROSENZWEIG, E. TILLEMAN, D. BEDEY, M.
CUFFE, B. GILLESPIE, S. GIST, C. SPRUNGER, G. LAMMERS, S. FITZPATRICK, B. LER, G. OBLANDER, J.
FITZPATRICK, S. MORIGEAU, M. THANE
AN ACT REVISING STATE FIRE POLICY REGARDING THE DUTIES OF A STATE OR LOCAL FIRE
PROTECTION ENTITY; AUTHORIZING THE STATE TO BILL A FEDERAL FIRE PROTECTION AGENCY FOR
STATE OR COUNTY COSTS INCURRED IN FIRE SUPPRESSION; AMENDING SECTION 76-13-115, MCA;
AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.